Utah statutes.
59-14-502.   Requirements for placement of warning labels.
Warning labels shall be securely affixed to each individual package of
smokeless tobacco products within 72 hours after receipt of the products by
any wholesaler, distributor, or retailer within this state.  All smokeless
tobacco products shall be affixed with warning labels before sale within the
state.  If any smokeless tobacco products are manufactured within the state,
they shall be affixed with warning labels by the manufacturer when sold.
